Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [270C.095] EFFECT OF TAX COURT OPINIONS. new text end new text begin The commissioner is bound by and must comply with the Tax Court's interpretation of the tax laws of this state until the interpretation is overturned by the supreme court. The phrase "tax laws of this state" has the meaning provided in section 271.01, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for judgments by the Tax Court issued the day following final enactment and thereafter. new text end